bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Биометрични монитори > Монитори за фертилност и тестове за овулация: Тестове и монитори за фертилност; Тестове за овулация
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 医療用測定器 > 排卵測定器・検査薬: 不妊症検査・モニター; 排卵検査
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > Biyometrik Monitörler > Doğurganlık Monitörleri ve Ovulasyon Testleri: Doğurganlık Testi ve Denetleyicisi; Ovülasyon Testleri
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Biometrični monitorji > Monitorji za ugotavljanje plodnosti in ovulacijski testi: Testi in monitorji za ugotavljanje plodnosti; Ovulacijski testi
fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Moniteurs biométriques > Moniteurs de fertilité et tests d’ovulation: Méthodes et tests de fertilité; Tests d’ovulation
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Monitory funkcji życiowych > Monitory płodności i testy owulacyjne: Testy i monitory płodności; Testy owulacyjne
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Dispositivos de monitorização biométrica > Testes de ovulação e monitorização de fertilidade: Monitores e testes de fertilidade; Testes de ovulação
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Biometrimätare > Fertilitetsmonitorer och ägglossningstest: Fertilitetstest och kontroller; Ägglossningstest
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Biometrikus figyelők > Termékenységi figyelők és ovulációs tesztek: Termékenységi tesztek és figyelők; Ovulációs tesztek
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Thiết bị theo dõi sinh trắc học > Que thử rụng trứng và máy theo dõi thời kỳ rụng trứng: Dụng cụ kiểm tra và que thử thai; Que thử rụng trứng
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Biometriske overvåkningsapparater > Fertilitetsmonitorer og eggløsningstestere: Fertilitetstester og -overvåkere; Eggløsningstester
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Biometrijski monitori > Uređaji za praćenje plodnosti i testovi ovulacije: Testovi i uređaji za praćenje plodnosti; Testovi ovulacije
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Monitoare biometrice > Monitoare pentru fertilitate și teste de ovulație: Teste și monitoare pentru fertilitate; Teste de ovulație
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Biometriske målere > Fertilitetsmonitorer og ægløsningstests: Fertilitetstests; Tests til ægløsning
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Monitores biométricos > Testes de ovulação e monitores de fertilidade: Testes e monitores de fertilidade; Testes de ovulação
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 생체신호 모니터 > 배란 주기 검사기: 가임 테스트 & 모니터; 배란 테스트
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Dispositivos biométricos > Tests de ovulación y monitores de fertilidad: Pruebas y monitores de fertilidad; Pruebas de ovulación
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Biometriniai monitoriai > Vaisingumo monitoriai ir ovuliacijos testai: Vaisingumo testai ir monitoriai; Ovuliacijos testai
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > เครื่องตรวจวัดชีวมิติ > เครื่องตรวจสอบภาวะเจริญพันธุ์และการทดสอบการตกไข่: อุปกรณ์ตรวจและหาระยะเวลาการตกไข่; ชุดตรวจไข่ตก
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 生物体征监测器 > 生育和排卵期检测工具: 排卵试纸/检测器; 排卵试纸
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Biometrische meters > Vruchtbaarheidsmonitors en ovulatietests: Vruchtbaarheidstests en -monitoren; Ovulatietests
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Βιομετρικές οθόνες > Μόνιτορ γονιμότητας και τεστ ωορρηξίας: Τεστ & οθόνες γονιμότητας; Τεστ ωορρηξίας
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Инструменты для измерения биометрических показателей > Мониторы фертильности и тесты на овуляцию: Мониторы фертильности; Тесты на овуляцию
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 生物識別監測 > 排卵檢測用品: 生育測試和監控器; 排卵測試
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Medizinische Messgeräte > Fruchtbarkeitsmonitore & Ovulationstests: Fruchtbarkeitstests und Fertilitätsmonitore; Ovulationstests
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Biometric Monitors > Fertility Monitors and Ovulation Tests: Fertility Tests & Monitors; Ovulation Tests
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Biometrické monitory > Monitory plodnosti a ovulačné testy: Testy a monitory plodnosti; Ovulačné testy
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Lettori biometrici > Test di ovulazione e monitoraggio della fertilità: Test e monitor di fertilità; Test di ovulazione
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Biometriset monitorit > Hedelmällisyystestit ja ovulaatiotestit: Hedelmällisyystestit ja -mittarit; Ovulaatiotestit
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Měřiče tělesných funkcí > Sledování plodných dnů a testování ovulace: Testy a monitory plodnosti; Ovulační testy